South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4510.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-51-90 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an heir of a deceased owner may redeem real property pursuant to this section. The requesting heir shall provide an affidavit establishing the redeemers' familial connection to the deceased property owner to the person officially charged with the collection of delinquent taxes, along with assessments, penalties, costs, and interest. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----